District of Columbia statutes.
7-2502.12

Definition of self-defense sprays.

For the purposes of §§ 7-2502.12 through 7-2502.14, the term:

“Self-defense spray” means a mixture of a lacrimator including chloroacetophenone, alphacloracetophenone, phenylchloromethylketone, orthochlorobenazalm-alononitrile or oleoresin capsicum.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title II, § 212
as added Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-244, § 2, 40 DCR 647
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 10(a), 41 DCR 5193
This section is referenced in § 7-2502.13.
1981 Ed., § 6-2322.